Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-161.05
Materiel administrator or employee; financial or beneficial personal interest forbidden; gifts and rebates prohibited; violations; penalty.

Neither the materiel administrator nor any employee under his or her direction shall be financially interested or have any beneficial personal interest, directly or indirectly, in the purchase or leasing of any personal property nor in any firm, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or association furnishing personal property. No such person shall receive or accept directly or indirectly from any person, firm, limited liability company, or corporation submitting any bid or to whom a contract may be awarded by rebate, gift, or otherwise, any money or other thing of value whatsoever or any promise, obligation, or contract for future reward, or compensation. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class IV felony and shall be subject to forfeiture of his or her office or position.

Laws 1963, c. 508, § 14, p. 1621;

Laws 1975, LB 359, § 10;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 265;

Laws 1992, LB 1241, § 19;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 523;

Laws 2017, LB320, § 3.